Maryland, session 2026, HB0814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–230.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ANY PROCUREMENT CONTRACT IN WHICH
THE RECOMMENDED AWARDEE EXECUTES AN AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT WITH A
SUBCONTRACTOR, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PROCUREMENT CONTRACT
REQUIRES THE PRIMARY CONTRACTOR TO EMPLOY A SUBCONTRACTOR.
(B) BEFORE A UNIT AWARDS A PROCUREMENT CONTRACT, THE
RECOMMENDED AWARDEE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE PROCUREMENT OFFICER A COPY
OF ANY AGREEMENT OR CONTRACT THE RECOMMENDED AWARDEE HAS EXECUTED
WITH A SUBCONTRACTOR.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0814*

HOUSE BILL 814
(C) A RECOMMENDED AWARDEE MAY REDACT AN AGREEMENT OR A
CONTRACT SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO REMOVE
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, PROPRIETARY COMMERCIAL INFORMATION, OR
TRADE SECRETS CONTAINED IN THE AGREEMENT.
(D) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.